Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.09] ACCESS TO CULTURALLY INCLUSIVE LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS PROTECTED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Access to culturally inclusive learning environments. new text end new text begin A school district must not ban, remove, or otherwise restrict culturally relevant resources and displays in educational environments on the sole basis of viewpoint or the messages, ideas, or opinions they convey. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Culturally relevant resources" means noncurricular materials in classroom spaces that contribute to or reflect the diversity of student and community cultures. new text end new text begin (c) "District" means a district under section 120A.05, subdivision 8, and includes a charter school under chapter 124E. new text end new text begin (d) "School board" means the board with authority to govern, manage, and control the schools in the district. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Limitations. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section limits a school board's authority to decline to purchase, distribute, or display materials legitimately based upon: new text end new text begin (1) practical reasons, including but not limited to space limitations; new text end new text begin (2) legitimate pedagogical concerns, including but not limited to the appropriateness of potentially sensitive topics for the school's intended audience or the likelihood of causing a material and substantial disruption of the work and discipline of the school; or new text end new text begin (3) compliance with state or federal law. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section impairs or limits the rights of a parent, guardian, or an adult student to review instructional materials under section 120B.20. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Discrimination prohibited. new text end new text begin A school board may not discriminate against or discipline an employee for complying with this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end